North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 16B. Money Transmitters Act.
§ 53-208.55.
Examination and investigation authority.

For purposes of initial licensure, suspension, conditioning, revocation, or termination, or general or specific inquiry, investigation, or examination to determine compliance with this Article, the Commissioner may access, receive, and use any books, accounts, records, files, documents, information, or evidence including:

Criminal, civil, and administrative history information;

Personal history and experience information;

Any other documents, information, or evidence the Commissioner deems relevant to the inquiry, investigation, or examination regardless of the location, possession, control, or custody of the documents, information, or evidence.

For purposes of investigating violations or complaints arising under this Article, or for the purposes of examination, the Commissioner may review, investigate, or examine any licensee, individual, or person subject to this Article in order to carry out the purposes of this Article. The Commissioner may interview the controlling persons, employees, independent contractors, delegates, third-party vendors, and customers of the licensee concerning the licensee’s business. The Commissioner may direct, subpoena, or order the person to produce books, accounts, records, files, and any other documents the Commissioner deems relevant to the inquiry. Any investigation or examination that, in the opinion of the Commissioner, requires extraordinary review, investigation, or special examination shall be subject to the actual costs of the additional expenses and the hourly rate for the staff’s time, to be determined annually by the State Banking Commission.

Each person subject to this Article shall make available to the Commissioner upon request the books and records relating to the operations of the licensee or person. No person subject to examination or investigation under this section may knowingly withhold, abstract, remove, mutilate, destroy, or secrete any books, records, or other information retained in any format. Each person subject to this Article shall also make available for interview by the Commissioner the controlling persons, employees, independent contractors, delegates, and third-party vendors of the person concerning money transmission subject to this Article.

Each person subject to this Article shall make or compile such reports or prepare other information as may be directed or requested by the Commissioner in order to carry out the purposes of this section.

In making any examination or investigation authorized by this Article, the Commissioner may control access to any documents and records of the person under examination or investigation. The Commissioner may take possession of the documents and records, or place a person in exclusive charge of the documents and records in the place where they are usually kept. During the period of control, no person shall remove or attempt to remove any of the documents and records except pursuant to a court order or with consent of the Commissioner. Unless the Commissioner has reasonable grounds to believe the documents or records have been or are at risk of destruction, the person shall retain access as necessary to conduct its ordinary business.

In order to carry out the purposes of this section, the Commissioner may:

Enter into agreements or relationships with other government officials or regulatory associations in order to improve efficiencies and reduce regulatory burden by sharing resources, standardized or uniform methods or procedures, and records and related information obtained under this section;

Use, hire, contract, or employ analytical systems, methods, or software to examine or investigate any person subject to this Article;

Accept and rely on examination or investigation reports made by other government officials, within or without this State;

Accept audit reports made by an independent certified public accountant or other qualified third-party auditor for any person subject to this Article and may incorporate the audit report in the report of examination or investigation.

History.

2016-81, s. 1; 2017-102, s. 46.

§ 53-208.56.
Licensure authority.

The Commissioner may by order, deny, suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue a license under this Article, or may restrict or limit the manner in which a licensee or applicant engages in the business of money transmission, if the Commissioner finds both of the following:

That the order is in the public interest.

Any of the following circumstances apply:

Any fact or condition exists that, if it had existed at the time of application, would have been grounds for denial.

The licensee or applicant has filed any application, report, or other document with the Commissioner containing statements that, in light of the circumstances in which they were made, were false or misleading with respect to a material fact.

The licensee or applicant fails at any time to meet the requirements of

G.S. 53-208.46

, 53-208.47, or 53-208.48.

A controlling person or key management personnel of the licensee or applicant has been convicted of any of the following:

A misdemeanor in the last 10 years involving fraud, money laundering, theft or wrongful taking of property, bribery, perjury, forgery, counterfeiting, extortion, or conspiracy to commit any of these offenses or involving any financial service or financial service-related business.

Any felony in the last seven years.

The licensee or applicant has violated or failed to comply with any provision of this Article, rule issued pursuant to this Article, or order of the Commissioner.

The licensee has conducted its business in an unsafe or unsound manner.

The licensee or applicant is insolvent, has suspended payment of its obligations, has made an assignment for the benefit of its creditors, or has admitted in writing its inability to pay its debts as they become due.

The licensee fails to respond to and cooperate fully with notices from the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee related to the scheduling and conducting of an examination or investigation pursuant to

G.S. 53-208.55

.

The licensee or applicant fails to respond to inquiries from the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee regarding any complaints filed, which allege or involve violation of this Article.

The licensee fails to make any report required by this Article.

The licensee or applicant is permanently or temporarily enjoined by any court of competent jurisdiction from engaging in or continuing any conduct or practice involving any aspect of the money transmission business.

The licensee or applicant is the subject of an order entered within the past five years by the authority of any state or federal agency with jurisdiction over the business of money transmission.

History.

2016-81, s. 1; 2017-102, s. 46; 2018-142, s. 10(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2018-142, s. 10(b), effective December 15, 2018, in subdivision (2)d., inserted “any of the following” at the end; and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 53-208.57.
Disciplinary authority.

Unless otherwise provided, all administrative actions and hearings conducted pursuant to this Article shall proceed in accordance with Article 3A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

Upon issuance of any summary order permitted under this Article the Commissioner shall promptly notify the person subject to the order that the order has been entered and the reasons for the order. Within 20 days of receiving notice of the order, the person subject to the order may request in writing a hearing before the Commissioner. Upon receipt of such a request, the Commissioner shall calendar a hearing within 15 days. If a licensee does not request a hearing, the order will remain in effect unless it is modified or vacated by the Commissioner.

The Commissioner may by order:

Impose a civil money penalty upon any person required to be licensed under this Article for any violation of or failure to comply with this Article or any order of the Commissioner in an amount specified by the Commissioner, not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation or, in the case of a continuing violation, one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day that the violation continues. Each violation of or failure to comply with this Article shall be a separate and distinct violation. All civil money penalties collected under this Article shall be paid to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

Require that any person required to be licensed under this Article to disgorge and pay to the sender any amounts that were not remitted or refunded in violation of G.S. 53-208.51(1).

In addition to the summary suspension procedures authorized by

G.S. 150B-3(c)

, if the Commissioner has reason to believe that a licensee or person subject to this Article may have violated or failed to comply with any provision of this Article and has reason to believe that such violation or failure to comply presents an imminent threat to the public, the Commissioner may:

Summarily order the licensee or person subject to this Article to cease and desist from any harmful activities or violations of this Article;

Summarily suspend the license of a licensee under this Article.

When a licensee is subject to disciplinary action under this Article, the licensee, with the consent and approval of the Commissioner, may surrender the license and all the rights and privileges pertaining to it. A person who surrenders a license shall not be eligible for or submit any application for licensure under this Article during any period specified by the Commissioner.

If it appears to the Commissioner that any person has committed or is about to commit a violation of any provision of this Article or of any rule or order of the Commission, the Commission may apply to Wake County Superior Court for an order enjoining the person from violating or continuing to violate this Article or any rule, regulation, or order and for injunctive or such other relief as the nature of the case may require.

The requirements of this Article apply to any person who seeks to avoid its application by any device, subterfuge, or pretense whatsoever, including structuring a transaction in a manner to avoid classification of the transaction as money transmission.

The Commissioner, in the exercise of reasonable judgment, may compromise, settle, and collect civil penalties with any person for violations of any provision of this Article, or of any rule, regulation, or order issued or promulgated pursuant to this Article.

History.

2016-81, s. 1; 2017-102, ss. 14.1(f), 46.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-102, s. 14.1(f), effective July 12, 2017, substituted “Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.” for “county school fund” in subdivision (c)(1); and substituted “pursuant” for “[pursuant]” in subsection (h).

§ 53-208.58.
Criminal penalties.

Any person who knowingly and willfully violates any provision of this Article for which a penalty is not specifically provided is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Any person who knowingly and willfully makes a material, false statement in any document filed or required to be filed under this Article with the intent to deceive the recipient of the document is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Any person who knowingly and willfully engages in the business of money transmission without a license as provided herein shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

2016-81, s. 1; 2017-102, s. 46.

§ 53-208.59.
Confidentiality.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all information or reports obtained by the Commissioner from an applicant, licensee, or authorized delegate, whether obtained through reports, applications, examination, audits, investigation, or otherwise, including (i) all information contained in or related to examination, investigation, operating, or condition reports prepared by, on behalf of, or for the use of the Commissioner; and (ii) financial statements, balance sheets, or authorized delegate information are subject to confidential treatment as set forth under

G.S. 53C-2-7

.

The Commissioner is authorized to enter agreements or sharing arrangements with other governmental agencies or associations representing governmental agencies and may share otherwise confidential information pursuant to these written agreements, but only to the extent permitted by

G.S. 53C-2-7(d)

. Information shared pursuant to the agreements authorized under this section shall retain any and all applicable privilege and related confidentiality protections provided by State or federal law.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the Commissioner from releasing to the public a list of persons licensed under this Article or aggregated financial data on those licensees.

History.

2016-81, s. 1; 2017-102, s. 46.

§ 53-208.60.
Rules.

The State Banking Commission may adopt rules necessary to implement this Article.

Pursuant to

G.S. 53C-2-6(b)

, any person aggrieved by any rule or order of the Commissioner under this Act may appeal to the State Banking Commission for review upon providing notice in writing within 20 days after the act complained of is adopted, issued, or done. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any aggrieved party to a decision of the State Banking Commission shall be entitled to petition for judicial review pursuant to

G.S. 53C-2-6(b)

.

History.

2016-81, s. 1; 2017-102, s. 46.

§ 53-208.61.
Service of process.

Any person subject to this Article is deemed to have:

Consented to the jurisdiction of the courts of this State for all actions arising under this Article; and

Appointed the Secretary of State as such person’s agent for the purpose of accepting service of process in any action, suit, or proceeding that may arise under this Article.

For the purposes of this Article, the Commissioner shall be deemed to have complied with the requirements of law concerning service of process upon mailing by certified mail any notice required or permitted to a person subject to this Article, postage prepaid and addressed to the last known address on file with the Commissioner.

History.

2016-81, s. 1; 2017-102, s. 46.

§ 53-208.62.
Commissioner’s participation in nationwide registry.

The Commissioner may require all persons subject to this Article to be licensed through the NMLS, and upon issuing this requirement, the Commissioner shall establish a reasonable transition period. In order to carry out these requirements, the Commissioner may participate in the NMLS.

The Commissioner may establish relationships or contracts with the NMLS or other entities designated by the NMLS to collect and maintain records and process transaction fees or other fees related to licensees or other persons subject to this Article.

For the purpose of participating in the NMLS, the Commissioner may waive or modify, in whole or in part, any or all of the requirements as reasonably necessary to participate in the NMLS.

History.

2016-81, s. 1; 2017-102, s. 46; 2018-142, s. 10(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2018-142, s. 10(c), effective December 15, 2018, substituted “may” for “is authorized to” throughout; in subsection (a), substituted “this” for “such” following “upon issuing”; and in subsection (b), substituted “persons” for “person” preceding “subject to.”

§ 53-208.63.
Severability.

Should any provision, sentence, clause, section, or part of this Article for any reason be held unconstitutional, illegal, or invalid, such unconstitutionality, illegality, or invalidity shall not affect or impair any of the remaining provisions, sentences, clauses, sections, or parts of this Article.

History.

2016-81, s. 1; 2017-102, s. 46.

§ 53-208.64.
Transition.

Any person who holds in good standing a money transmitters license issued by the Commissioner on or after November 1, 2014, may continue to engage in such business subject to the requirements of this Article.

History.

2016-81, s. 1; 2017-102, s. 46.